Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1,124
Prohibited brand; violation; penalty.

If any person willfully and knowingly brands, marks, or causes to be branded or marked, livestock owned by another with the intent to deprive such owner of the livestock or willfully and knowingly effaces, defaces, or obliterates any mark upon any livestock owned by another with the intent to deprive such owner of the livestock, such person is guilty of a Class III felony.

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 55.

Failure to instruct upon effect of this section was prejudicial error. Coomes v. Drinkwalter, 181 Neb. 450, 149 N.W.2d 60 (1967).